New York, session 2025-2026, A2346.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 485.05 of the penal law, as 2 amended by section 2 of part C of chapter 55 of the laws of 2024, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 3. A "specified offense" is an offense defined by any of the following 5 provisions of this chapter: section 120.00 (assault in the third 6 degree); section 120.05 (assault in the second degree); section 120.06 7 (gang assault in the second degree); section 120.07 (gang assault in the 8 first degree); section 120.10 (assault in the first degree); section 9 120.12 (aggravated assault upon a person less than eleven years old); 10 section 120.13 (menacing in the first degree); section 120.14 (menacing 11 in the second degree); section 120.15 (menacing in the third degree); 12 section 120.20 (reckless endangerment in the second degree); section 13 120.25 (reckless endangerment in the first degree); section 121.11 14 (criminal obstruction of breathing or blood circulation); section 121.12 15 (strangulation in the second degree); section 121.13 (strangulation in 16 the first degree); subdivision one of section 125.15 (manslaughter in 17 the second degree); subdivision one, two or four of section 125.20 18 (manslaughter in the first degree); section 125.25 (murder in the second 19 degree); section 125.26 (aggravated murder); section 125.27 (murder in 20 the first degree); section 120.45 (stalking in the fourth degree); 21 section 120.50 (stalking in the third degree); section 120.55 (stalking 22 in the second degree); section 120.60 (stalking in the first degree); 23 section 130.20 (sexual misconduct); section 130.25 (rape in the third 24 degree); section 130.30 (rape in the second degree); section 130.35 25 (rape in the first degree); former section 130.40; former section 26 130.45; former section 130.50; section 130.52 (forcible touching); EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00184-01-5 A. 2346 2 1 section 130.53 (persistent sexual abuse); section 130.55 (sexual abuse 2 in the third degree); section 130.60 (sexual abuse in the second 3 degree); section 130.65 (sexual abuse in the first degree); section 4 130.65-a (aggravated sexual abuse in the fourth degree); section 130.66 5 (aggravated sexual abuse in the third degree); section 130.67 (aggra- 6 vated sexual abuse in the second degree); section 130.70 (aggravated 7 sexual abuse in the first degree); section 135.05 (unlawful imprisonment 8 in the second degree); section 135.10 (unlawful imprisonment in the 9 first degree); section 135.20 (kidnapping in the second degree); section 10 135.25 (kidnapping in the first degree); section 135.60 (coercion in the 11 third degree); section 135.61 (coercion in the second degree); section 12 135.65 (coercion in the first degree); section 140.10 (criminal trespass 13 in the third degree); section 140.15 (criminal trespass in the second 14 degree); section 140.17 (criminal trespass in the first degree); section 15 140.20 (burglary in the third degree); section 140.25 (burglary in the 16 second degree); section 140.30 (burglary in the first degree); section 17 145.00 (criminal mischief in the fourth degree); section 145.05 (crimi- 18 nal mischief in the third degree); section 145.10 (criminal mischief in 19 the second degree); section 145.12 (criminal mischief in the first 20 degree); section 145.26 (aggravated cemetery desecration in the second 21 degree); section 145.27 (aggravated cemetery desecration in the first 22 degree); section 150.05 (arson in the fourth degree); section 150.10 23 (arson in the third degree); section 150.15 (arson in the second 24 degree); section 150.20 (arson in the first degree); section 155.25 25 (petit larceny); section 155.30 (grand larceny in the fourth degree); 26 section 155.35 (grand larceny in the third degree); section 155.40 27 (grand larceny in the second degree); section 155.42 (grand larceny in 28 the first degree); section 160.05 (robbery in the third degree); section 29 160.10 (robbery in the second degree); section 160.15 (robbery in the 30 first degree); section 230.34 (sex trafficking); section 230.34-a (sex 31 trafficking of a child); section 240.25 (harassment in the first 32 degree); subdivision one, two or four of section 240.30 (aggravated 33 harassment in the second degree); section 240.50 (falsely reporting an 34 incident in the third degree); section 240.55 (falsely reporting an 35 incident in the second degree); section 240.60 (falsely reporting an 36 incident in the first degree); subdivision one of section 265.03 (crimi- 37 nal possession of a weapon in the second degree); subdivision one of 38 section 265.04 (criminal possession of a weapon in the first degree); 39 section 490.10 (soliciting or providing support for an act of terrorism 40 in the second degree); section 490.15 (soliciting or providing support 41 for an act of terrorism in the first degree); section 490.20 (making a 42 terroristic threat); section 490.25 (crime of terrorism); section 490.30 43 (hindering prosecution of terrorism in the second degree); section 44 490.35 (hindering prosecution of terrorism in the first degree); section 45 490.37 (criminal possession of a chemical weapon or biological weapon in 46 the third degree); section 490.40 (criminal possession of a chemical 47 weapon or biological weapon in the second degree); section 490.45 (crim- 48 inal possession of a chemical weapon or biological weapon in the first 49 degree); section 490.47 (criminal use of a chemical weapon or biological 50 weapon in the third degree); section 490.50 (criminal use of a chemical 51 weapon or biological weapon in the second degree); section 490.55 (crim- 52 inal use of a chemical weapon or biological weapon in the first degree); 53 or any attempt or conspiracy to commit any of the foregoing offenses. 54 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.